ro-RO: Tip de încărcător pentru pușcă: Încărcător tip cutie detașabil; Încărcător tip tambur; Încărcător tip clip (en-bloc); Magazie internă fixă; Un singur foc (fără magazie); Clamă de încărcare (încărcare prin partea superioară); Magazie tubulară; Altele
ja: ライフルマガジンタイプ: 着脱式ボックスマガジン; ドラムマガジン; エンブロッククリップ; 固定式内蔵マガジン; 単発式 (マガジンなし); ストリッパークリップ (トップロード); チューブマガジン; その他
lt-LT: Šautuvo dėtuves tipas: Nuimama dėžutės formos dėtuvė; Būgninė dėtuvė; „En-bloc“ apkaba; Fiksuota vidinė dėtuvė; Vienšūvis (be dėtuvės); Juostelinė apkaba (užtaisoma iš viršaus); Vamzdinė dėtuvė; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta nabojnika za puško: Odstranljiv škatlasti nabojnik; Bobnasti nabojnik; Okvir (en-bloc); Fiksni notranji nabojnik; Enostrelno (brez nabojnika); Odprti okvir (polnjenje od zgoraj); Cevasti nabojnik; Drugo
ru: Тип магазина винтовки: Отъемный коробчатый магазин; Барабанный магазин; Пачечная обойма; Неотъемный магазин; Однозарядная (без магазина); Обойма (заряжание сверху); Трубчатый магазин; Другое
cs: Typ zásobníku pušky: Odnímatelný schránkový zásobník; Bubnový zásobník; Rámeček (en-bloc); Pevná nábojová schránka; Jednoranný (bez zásobníku); Nábojový pásek (plněný shora); Trubicový zásobník; Jiné
es: Tipo de cargador del rifle: Cargador de caja extraíble; Cargador de tambor; Peine en bloque; Cargador interno fijo; Monotiro (sin cargador); Peine (carga superior); Cargador tubular; Otro
ko: 소총 탄창 유형: 탈착식 박스 탄창; 드럼 탄창; 엔블록 클립; 고정식 내부 탄창; 단발식(탄창 없음); 스트리퍼 클립(상단 장전식); 튜브 탄창; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de carregador da espingarda: Carregador de caixa amovível; Carregador de tambor; Clipe em bloco; Carregador interno fixo; Tiro único (sem carregador); Pente (carregamento superior); Carregador tubular; Outro
pl: Typ magazynka karabinu: Wymienny magazynek pudełkowy; Magazynek bębnowy; Ładownik; Stały magazynek wewnętrzny; Jednostrzałowy (bez magazynka); Łódka nabojowa (ładowana od góry); Magazynek rurowy; Inny
bg-BG: Тип пълнител за пушка: Сваляем кутиен пълнител; Барабанен пълнител; Патронен клипс (En-bloc); Фиксиран вътрешен пълнител; Еднозарядно (без пълнител); Зареждане с клипс отгоре (Stripper clip); Тръбен пълнител; Други
tr: Tüfek şarjör tipi: Çıkarılabilir kutu şarjör; Tambur şarjör; Blok klips; Sabit dahili şarjör; Tek atışlı (şarjörsüz); Sıyırıcı klips (üstten doldurmalı); Tüp şarjör; Diğer
nl: Toevoersysteemtype voor het geweer.: Afneembaar doosmagazijn; Trommelmagazijn; En-bloc clip; Vast intern magazijn; Enkelschots (geen magazijn); Laadstrip (bovenlader); Buismagazijn; Overige
en: Rifle magazine type: Detachable box magazine; Drum magazine; En-bloc clip; Fixed internal magazine; Single-shot (no magazine); Stripper clip (top-loaded); Tube magazine; Other
de: Magazintyp des Gewehrs: Abnehmbares Kastenmagazin; Trommelmagazin; Laderahmen (En-Bloc); Festes internes Magazin; Einzellader (ohne Magazin); Ladestreifen (Top-Loader); Röhrenmagazin; Sonstige
vi: Loại băng đạn súng trường: Hộp đạn tháo rời; Băng đạn dạng trống; Kẹp đạn en-bloc; Hộp đạn gắn trong; Bắn phát một (không hộp đạn); Kẹp đạn (nạp từ trên xuống); Hộp đạn ống; Khác
it: Tipo di caricatore per fucile: Caricatore a scatola amovibile; Caricatore a tamburo; Piastrina en-bloc; Caricatore interno fisso; A colpo singolo (senza caricatore); Piastrina di caricamento (dall'alto); Caricatore tubolare; Altro
zh-CN: 步枪弹匣类型: 可拆卸弹匣; 弹鼓; 漏夹; 固定内置弹仓; 单发（无弹匣）; 桥夹（顶部装填）; 管式弹仓; 其他
pt-BR: Fuzil tipo de carregador: Carregador de cofre destacável; Carregador tipo tambor; Clipe em bloco; Carregador interno fixo; Tiro único (sem carregador); Clipe stripper (carregamento superior); Carregador tubular; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta spremnika za pušku: Odvojivi kutijasti spremnik; Bubanj spremnik; En-bloc okvir; Fiksni unutarnji spremnik; Jedan hitac (bez spremnika); Okvir za punjenje odozgo (stripper clip); Cjevasti spremnik; Ostalo
fr: Type de chargeur du fusil: Chargeur amovible; Chargeur tambour; Clip en bloc; Magasin interne fixe; À un coup (sans chargeur); Lame-chargeur (chargement par le haut); Magasin tubulaire; Autre
el: Τύπος γεμιστήρα τουφεκιού: Αποσπώμενος γεμιστήρας; Κυκλικός γεμιστήρας (τύπου ταμπούρλου); Κλιπ τύπου En-bloc; Σταθερός εσωτερικός γεμιστήρας; Μονόσφαιρο (χωρίς γεμιστήρα); Κλιπ τύπου Stripper (άνω γέμισης); Σωληνωτός γεμιστήρας; Άλλο
fi: Kiväärin lippaan tyyppi: Irrotettava tankolipas; Rumpulipas; Latauskehys; Kiinteä makasiini; Kertatuli (ei lipasta); Latauskampa (päältä ladattava); Putkilipas; Muu
da: Riffelmagasintype: Aftageligt boksmagasin; Tromlemagasin; Laderamme; Fast internt magasin; Enkeltskuds (intet magasin); Laderamme (topladet); Rørmagasin; Andet
zh-TW: 步槍彈匣類型: 可拆卸盒裝彈匣; 彈鼓; 漏夾; 固定內置彈倉; 單發 (無彈匣); 橋夾 (頂部裝填); 管狀彈倉; 其他
hu: Puskatár típusa: Kivehető szekrénytár; Csigatár; En-bloc tár; Beépített tár; Egylövetű (tár nélkül); Töltőléc (felülről tölthető); Csőtár; Egyéb
nb: Type geværmagasin: Avtakbart boksmagasin; Trommelmagasin; En-bloc-klips; Fast innvendig magasin; Enkeltskudd (uten magasin); Ladeskinne (toppladet); Rørmagasin; Annet
sv: Typ av gevärsmagasin: Löstagbart lådmagasin; Trummagasin; Laddram; Fast internt magasin; Enskottsvapen (inget magasin); Laddram (toppladdad); Rörmagasin; Övrigt
th: แม็กกาซีนปืนไรเฟิล: แมกกาซีนแบบกล่องถอดได้; แมกกาซีนแบบดรัม; คลิปกระสุนแบบ En-bloc; แมกกาซีนในตัว; นัดเดียว (ไม่มีแมกกาซีน); คลิปกระสุน (โหลดจากด้านบน); แมกกาซีนแบบหลอด; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ zásobníka pušky: Odnímateľný schránkový zásobník; Bubnový zásobník; Nábojový rámik (en-bloc); Pevná nábojová schránka; Jednovýstrelová (bez zásobníka); Nabíjací pásik (nabíjanie zhora); Trubicový zásobník; Iné